Utah statutes.
10-8-16.   Watercourses leading to and within city -- Mill privileges.

They may control the water and watercourses leading to the city and regulate and control the watercourses and mill privileges within the city; provided, that the control may not be exercised to the injury of any right already acquired by actual owners.

